West Virginia, session 2026, SB653.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 4.  GENERAL SERVICES DIVISION. §5A-4-7. Placement of statue of U.S. Army Specialist Sarah Beckstrom in a corner of the rotunda of the Capitol. (a) The Legislature directs the secretary of the Department of Administration to plan and place a statue of U.S. Army Specialist Sarah Beckstrom placed in a corner of the rotunda of the Capitol. (b) The General Services Division of the Department of Administration shall use funds from the special "capitol renovation and improvement fund" previously created for funding of the statue of U.S. Army Specialist Sarah Beckstrom and the placement of this statue in corner of the rotunda of the Capitol.(c) The base of the statue shall include a list of Specialist Beckstrom's military awards and her date of birth and date of death.